pr11.dix
<pardef n="AkeV/_pn">
        <e><p>
                <l>yu</l>
                <r><s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>yannu</l>
                <r><s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>yiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
        <e><p>
                <l>geV</l>
				<r><s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="f"/></r>
		</p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>gAgi</l>
				<r><s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="f"/></r>
		</p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>goskara</l>
				<r><s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="f"/></r>
		</p></e>
		
		<e><p>
                <l>ya deVseVyiMxa</l>
                <r><s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
		<e><p>
                <l>ya</l>
                <r><s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
        
		<e><p>
                <l>yalli</l>
                <r><s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
        		
        <e><p>
                <l>ye</l>
                <r><s n="pn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p></e>
</pardef>

</pardefs>

<e lm="AkeV"><i>AkeV</i><par n="AkeV/_pn"/></e>
<e lm="IkeV"><i>IkeV</i><par n="AkeV/_pn"/></e>
